Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5324
Loans; requirements.

(1) All loans made under the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act shall be made only to owners of public water systems that:

(a) Meet the requirements of financial, technical, and managerial capability set by the department;

(b) Pledge sufficient revenue sources for the repayment of the loan if such revenue may by law be pledged for that purpose;

(c) In the case of a privately owned public water system, pledge sufficient revenue, collateral, or other security for the repayment of the loan;

(d) Agree to maintain financial records according to generally accepted government accounting principles and to conduct an audit of the financial records according to generally accepted government auditing standards; and

(e) Provide a written assurance, signed by an attorney holding an active license to practice in the State of Nebraska, that the recipient has proper title, easements, and rights-of-way to the property on or through which the safe drinking water project is to be constructed or extended.

(2) Loans made for the construction of a safe drinking water project shall be made only to owners of public water systems which meet the conditions of subsection (1) of this section and, in addition, that:

(a) Require the contractor of the project to post separate performance and payment bonds or other security approved by the department in the amount of the bid;

(b) Provide a written notice of completion and start of operation of the safe drinking water project;

(c) Employ a registered professional engineer to provide and be responsible for engineering services on the project such as an engineering report, construction contract documents, observation of construction, and startup services; and

(d) Agree to operate and maintain the safe drinking water project so that it will function properly over the structural and material design life.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 13;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 48.